Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB799.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 11 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any law enacted by the General Assembly or program created by an act of the
General Assembly that directs an executive branch agency to perform a task or
provide a service shall be executed to the fullest extent by the agency.
(2) If the General Assembly does not provide additional funding or an appropriation
in its directive, then the agency shall be required to perform the task or provide
the service from its existing funds.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:27 AM Jacketed